Utah statutes.
10-5-108.   Budget hearing -- Notice -- Adjustments.
(1)  Prior to the adoption of the final budget, each town council shall hold a
public hearing to receive public comment.
(2)  The council shall provide notice of the place, purpose, and time of the
public hearing by publishing notice at least seven days before the hearing:
(a) (i)  at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the town; or
(ii)  if there is no newspaper of general circulation, then by posting the
notice in three public places at least 48 hours prior to the hearing; and
(b)  as required in Section 45-1-101.
(3)  After the hearing, the council, subject to Section 10-5-110, may adjust
expenditures and revenues in conformity with this chapter.
